Tennessee, session 114, HB0640.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-13-136(c)(1), is amended by
deleting "May 1" wherever it appears in the subdivision and substituting "May 15".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0640
000941
- 1 -